Utah statutes.
63M-7-202.   Composition -- Appointments -- Ex officio members -- Terms --
U.S. Attorney as nonvoting member.
(1)  The commission on criminal and juvenile justice shall be composed of 21
voting members as follows:
(a)  the chief justice of the supreme court, as the presiding officer of the
judicial council, or a judge designated by the chief justice;
(b)  the state court administrator;
(c)  the executive director of the Department of Corrections;
(d)  the director of the Division of Juvenile Justice Services;
(e)  the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety;
(f)  the attorney general;
(g)  the president of the chiefs of police association or a chief of police
designated by the association's president;
(h)  the president of the sheriffs' association or a sheriff designated by the
association's president;
(i)  the chair of the Board of Pardons and Parole or a member designated by
the chair;
(j)  the chair of the Utah Sentencing Commission;
(k)  the chair of the Utah Substance Abuse and Anti-Violence Coordinating
Council;
(l)  the chair of the Utah Board of Juvenile Justice;
(m)  the chair of the Utah Council on Victims of Crime or the chair's
designee;
(n)  the director of the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health; and
(o)  the following members designated to serve four-year terms:
(i)  a juvenile court judge, appointed by the chief justice, as presiding
officer of the Judicial Council;
(ii)  a representative of the statewide association of public attorneys
designated by the association's officers;
(iii)  one member of the House of Representatives who is appointed by the
speaker of the House of Representatives; and
(iv)  one member of the Senate who is appointed by the president of the
Senate.
(2)  The governor shall appoint the remaining three members to four-year
staggered terms as follows:
(a)  one criminal defense attorney appointed from a list of three nominees
submitted by the Utah State Bar Association;
(b)  one representative of public education; and
(c)  one citizen representative.
(3)  In addition to the members designated under Subsections (1) and (2), the
United States Attorney for the district of Utah may serve as a nonvoting
member.
(4)  In appointing the members under Subsection (2), the governor shall take
into account the geographical makeup of the commission.
